Utah statutes.
41-6a-1609.   Lamps and reflectors on vehicles not otherwise specified --
Slow-moving vehicle identification emblems on animal-drawn vehicles.
(1)  An animal-drawn vehicle, a vehicle under Section 41-6a-1604, and a
vehicle not specifically required by the provisions of other sections in this
chapter to be equipped with lamps or other lighting devices, shall be equipped
with lamps or other lighting devices if operated on a highway under the
conditions specified under Subsection 41-6a-1603(1)(a) as follows:
(a)  at least one lamp displaying a white light visible from a distance of not
less than 1,000 feet to the front of the vehicle; and
(b) (i)  two lamps displaying red light visible from a distance of not less
than 1,000 feet to the rear of the vehicle; or
(ii)  one lamp displaying a red light visible from a distance of not less than
1,000 feet to the rear and two red reflectors visible from all distances of
600 to 100 feet to the rear when illuminated by the lawful lower beams of head
lamps.
(2)  An animal-drawn vehicle shall at all times be equipped with a slow-moving
vehicle identification emblem as provided under Section 41-6a-1608.
